Maine, session 132, LD1924.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §5122, sub-§2, ¶AAA is enacted to read:
AAA. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026 but before January 1,
2031, to the extent included in federal adjusted gross income and to the extent
otherwise subject to Maine income tax, the amount of any gain resulting from the sale
of new residential housing in this State intended for occupancy by the purchaser or
from the lease of new residential housing in this State intended for occupancy by the
lessee. As used in this paragraph, "new residential housing" means a residential unit
of which at least half of the square footage has not been occupied in the 12 months
prior to the unit's sale or lease and includes, but is not limited to, single-family and
multi-unit residential housing, mobile homes and manufactured housing. The
deduction allowed by this paragraph may be taken for the taxable year in which the
new residential housing is first occupied by the purchaser or lessee and continues until
the new residential housing is no longer occupied by the purchaser or the lessee or the
taxable year ending December 31, 2031, whichever occurs first.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §5200-A, sub-§2, ¶JJ is enacted to read:
JJ. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026 but before January 1, 2031,
to the extent included in federal adjusted gross income and to the extent otherwise
subject to Maine income tax, the amount of any gain resulting from the sale of new
residential housing in this State intended for occupancy by the purchaser or from the
lease of new residential housing in this State intended for occupancy by the lessee. As
used in this paragraph, "new residential housing" means a residential unit of which at
least half of the square footage has not been occupied in the 12 months prior to the
unit's sale or lease and includes, but is not limited to, single family and multi-unit
residential housing, mobile homes and manufactured housing. The deduction allowed
by this paragraph may be taken for the taxable year in which the new residential
housing is first occupied by the purchaser or lessee and continues until the new
residential housing is no longer occupied by the purchaser or the lessee or the taxable
year ending December 31, 2031, whichever occurs first.